Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1169YH (3) 91 sc/js H.F. 823 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 35.4 Appointments with county 1 commission of veteran affairs ââ employee leave. 2 1. An employee who is a veteran shall be entitled to unpaid 3 leave for an appointment with a county commission of veteran 4 affairs. 5 2. Before attending an appointment with a county commission 6 of veteran affairs, the employee shall provide the employer 7 with a written request for leave at least five calendar days in 8 advance of the time the employee is requesting to take leave 9 as provided in this section. In emergency situations, no more 10 than twenty-four hoursâ notice shall be required. 11 3. A veteran may file a complaint with the Iowa office 12 of civil rights pursuant to section 216.15 if the veteranâs 13 employer denies a timely request, without a good-faith reason, 14 for using unpaid leave to attend an appointment with a county 15 commission of veteran affairs or retaliates against the veteran 16 for using unpaid leave to attend an appointment with a county 17 commission of veteran affairs when the employee gave the 18 employer proper notice and such leave was not denied for a 19 good-faith reason. 20 Sec. 2. Section 216.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 21 by adding the following new paragraph: 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Employer to deny unpaid leave, without a 23 good-faith reason, to an employee who is a veteran as defined 24 in section 35.1 for the purpose of attending an appointment 25 with a county commission of veteran affairs, or to retaliate 26 against an employee who is a veteran for taking unpaid leave 27 for such purpose when the employee gave the employer proper 28 notice and such leave was not denied for a good-faith reason. 29